New Jersey, session 221, S231.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1985, c.85 (C.52:27D-130.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    No person shall be required to pay a [municipal] fee or charge in order to secure a construction permit or receive plan review for the installation or alteration of a solar energy [heating or cooling] system in any building or part thereof.  As used in this [act] section, "solar energy [heating and cooling] system" means a solar energy system which is certified as eligible for an exemption from property taxation as a renewable energy system by [the Department of Community Affairs] an enforcing agency pursuant to [P.L.1977, c.256 (C.54:4-3.113 et seq.)] P.L.2008, c.90 (C.54:4-3.113a et seq.). (cf: P.L.1985, c.85, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.85 (C.52:27D-130.3) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The installation or alteration of a solar energy [heating or cooling] system in any building shall not be subject to any fee, including any surcharge or training fee, imposed by any department or agency of State government pursuant to any law, or rule or regulation.  As used in this section, "solar energy system" means a solar energy system which is certified as eligible for an exemption from property taxation as a renewable energy system by a local enforcing agency pursuant to P.L.2008, c.90 (C.54:4-3.113a et seq.). (cf: P.L.1985, c.85, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.